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DTC P 1520/95StopLightSwitchSignalMalfunction(Only
for A/T)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This signal is used to detect when the brakes have been applied. The STP signal voltage is the same as
the voltage supplied to the stop lights.
TheSTPsignal isusedmainly tocontrol the fuel cut −offenginespeed(The fuel cut −offenginespeed is re-
duced slightly when the vehicle is braking.).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1520/95
Thestop lightswitchdoesnot turnoffevenonce thevehicle is
driven
(2 trip detection logic)

SShort instop lightswitchsignalcircuit
SStop lightswitch
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using a hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at the time of the
malfunction.

1 Check operation of stop light.

CHECK:
Check if the stop lights go on and off normally when the brake pedal is operated and released.

NG Check and repair stop light circuit.

OK

2 Check STP signal.

When using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tes-

ter main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the STP signal on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Brake Pedal STP Signal

Depressed ON

Released OFF

When not using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the voltage between terminal STP of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Brake Pedal Voltage

Depressed 7.5 − 14V

Released Below 1.5 V

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

NG
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3 Check harness and connector between engine ECU and stop light switch
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


